Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. 630 Section 1. Section 8.57C, subsections 2, 3, and 4, Code 1 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 2. Moneys in the fund in a fiscal year shall be used as 3 appropriated by the general assembly for the acquisition 4 of computer hardware and software, software development, 5 telecommunications equipment, and maintenance and lease 6 agreements associated with technology components and for the 7 purchase of equipment intended to provide an uninterruptible 8 power supply to the department of management to provide 9 a stable funding source for implementation costs of state 10 information technology projects that enhance the stateâs 11 technology infrastructure, improve government services, 12 and promote innovation and economic development, including 13 but not limited to new information technology projects 14 and infrastructure replacement efforts of a department or 15 establishment . 16 3. a. The department of management shall prioritize 17 proposed projects based on all of the following considerations: 18 (1) Whether the project aligns with the stateâs strategic 19 priorities. 20 (2) Whether the project promotes or introduces new 21 technology or significantly improves an existing system. 22 (3) Whether the project is feasible and whether the 23 department or establishment has established readiness for the 24 project to proceed, including a clear assessment of timelines, 25 budgets, and measurable outcomes. 26 (4) Whether the project includes a clear change management 27 strategy to support user adoption and aligns with lean 28 enterprise principles to maximize value, minimize waste, and 29 ensure continuous improvement. 30 (5) Whether the project provides a positive return on 31 investment, considering both financial returns and nonfinancial 32 benefits such as improved public safety, education, or health 33 care. 34 (6) Whether the project results in infrastructure that is 35 -1- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 15 S.F. 630 scalable across the state enterprise. 1 (7) Whether the department or establishment has identified 2 how the completed project will be sustained beyond the initial 3 funding period. 4 (8) Whether the project improves access to governmental 5 services, particularly in rural communities. 6 (9) Whether the project involves an infrastructure project 7 as opposed to maintenance or standard upgrades of existing 8 technology. 9 b. The department of management shall provide a prioritized 10 list of proposed projects for funding to the governor, who 11 shall use the list in developing a budgetary recommendation 12 for the general assembly pursuant to section 8.21 for the 13 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and for each fiscal year 14 thereafter. 15 3. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 16 state to the technology reinvestment fund for the fiscal year 17 beginning July 1, 2025, and for each subsequent fiscal year 18 thereafter, the sum of seventeen million five hundred thousand 19 dollars. 20 b. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 21 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023, 22 and ending June 30, 2024, the sum of eighteen million three 23 hundred ninety thousand two hundred ninety dollars to the 24 technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding section 8.57, 25 subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 26 c. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 27 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, 28 and ending June 30, 2025, the sum of twenty-one million one 29 hundred thirty-one thousand eight hundred seventy-three dollars 30 to the technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding section 31 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 32 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the technology 33 reinvestment fund that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 34 the close of a fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 35 -2- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 2/ 15 S.F. 630 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until 1 the close of the fiscal year that ends three years after the 2 end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation was made. 3 Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or 4 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 5 4. Annually, on On or before January 15 of each year, a 6 state agency that received an appropriation from this fund 7 the department of management shall report to the legislative 8 services agency and the department of management general 9 assembly the status of all projects funded under this section 10 that have been completed since the previous report was 11 submitted or that are in progress. The report shall must 12 include a description of the project, the progress of work 13 completed, the total estimated cost of the project, a list of 14 all revenue sources being used to fund the project, the amount 15 of funds moneys expended, the amount of funds moneys obligated, 16 and the date the project was completed or an estimated 17 completion date of the project, where applicable. 18 Sec. 2. Section 8.78, Code 2025, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 8.78 Background checks. 21 An applicant for employment with the department, or 22 an applicant for employment with a supported entity for a 23 position as information technology staff, may be subject to a 24 background investigation by the department. The background 25 investigation may include, without limitation, a work history, 26 financial review, request for criminal history data, and 27 national criminal history check through the federal bureau of 28 investigation. In addition, a contractor, vendor, employee, or 29 any other individual performing work for the department, or an 30 individual on the information technology staff of a supported 31 entity, may be subject to a national criminal history check 32 through the federal bureau of investigation at least once 33 every ten five years, including, without limitation, any time 34 the department or supported entity has reason to believe an 35 -3- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 3/ 15 S.F. 630 individual has been convicted of a crime. The department may 1 request the national criminal history check and, if requested, 2 shall provide the individualâs fingerprints to the department 3 of public safety for submission through the state criminal 4 history repository to the federal bureau of investigation. 5 The individual shall authorize release of the results of the 6 national criminal history check to the department and the 7 applicable supported entity. The department shall pay the 8 actual cost of the fingerprinting and national criminal history 9 check, if any, unless otherwise agreed as part of a contract 10 between the department or supported entity and a vendor or 11 contractor performing work for the department or supported 12 entity. The results of a criminal history check conducted 13 pursuant to this section shall not be considered a public 14 record under chapter 22 . 15 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 8.94 Contracts ââ prohibited terms. 16 Provisions included in a contract entered into pursuant to 17 this subchapter that impose terms or conditions prohibited by 18 this section are void as contrary to public policy. Such a 19 contract shall be interpreted and enforced as if the contract 20 did not include the prohibited terms or conditions. Prohibited 21 terms and conditions include all of the following: 22 1. A provision requiring the department or a supported 23 entity to defend, indemnify, hold harmless another person, or 24 otherwise assume the debt or liability of another person in 25 violation of Article VII, section 1, of the Constitution of the 26 State of Iowa. 27 2. A provision that seeks to impose a term that is unknown 28 to the department or supported entity at the time of signing 29 the contract or that can be unilaterally changed by an entity 30 other than the department or a supported entity. 31 3. A provision that violates chapter 13 by not allowing 32 the department or a supported entity to participate in its own 33 defense through representation by the attorney general. 34 4. A provision that grants to a person other than the 35 -4- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 4/ 15 S.F. 630 attorney general the authority to convey to a court or litigant 1 the stateâs consent to any settlement of a suit involving the 2 contract when such settlement could impose liability on the 3 state. 4 5. A provision that specifies that the contract is governed 5 by the laws of a foreign state or nation. 6 6. A provision that claims blanket confidentiality of the 7 contractâs terms. 8 7. A provision that claims that payment terms, including but 9 not limited to cost proposals or other pricing information, of 10 the contract are confidential. 11 8. A provision that authorizes or requires a venue for 12 litigation other than an appropriate state or federal court 13 sitting in Iowa. 14 9. A provision that requires the department or a supported 15 entity to pay attorney fees, court costs, or other litigation 16 expenses in the event of a contractual dispute. 17 10. A provision that imposes on the department or a 18 supported entity binding arbitration or any other binding 19 extrajudicial dispute resolution process in which the final 20 resolution is not determined by the state. 21 11. A provision that waives the departmentâs or a supported 22 entityâs right to a jury trial. 23 12. A provision that obligates the department or a supported 24 entity to pay late payment charges not consistent with section 25 8A.514, interest greater than allowed under section 8A.514 or 26 other applicable law, or any cancellation charges, as such 27 charges constitute pledges of the stateâs credit. 28 13. A provision that obligates the department or a supported 29 entity to pay a tax. 30 14. A provision that imposes a prior notice obligation 31 on the department or a supported entity as a condition for 32 the automatic renewal of a software license. The department 33 or a supported entity may provide notice of its intent to 34 terminate a software license at any time before the renewal 35 -5- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 5/ 15 S.F. 630 date established in the contract. 1 15. A provision that obligates the department or a supported 2 entity to accept risk of loss before the receipt of items or 3 goods. 4 16. A provision that obligates the department or a supported 5 entity to have commercial insurance. 6 17. A provision that obligates the department or a supported 7 entity to grant to a nongovernmental entity full or partial 8 ownership of intellectual property developed pursuant to the 9 contract when the intellectual property is developed in whole 10 or in part using federal funding. 11 18. A provision that limits the time in which the department 12 or a supported entity may bring a legal claim under the 13 contract to a period shorter than that provided in Iowa law. 14 19. A boilerplate provision included in transactional 15 documents received by the department or a supported entity that 16 seeks to alter the terms of the contract or to impose new terms 17 in the contract. 18 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 8.95 Contracts ââ required terms. 19 All of the following provisions shall be deemed to be 20 included in a contract entered into by the department or a 21 supported entity under this subchapter: 22 1. Governing law. The contract shall be governed by 23 the laws of the state of Iowa, without giving effect to any 24 conflicts of law principles of Iowa law that may require the 25 application of another jurisdictionâs law. 26 2. Venue. Any litigation commenced in connection with the 27 contract shall be brought and maintained in an appropriate 28 state or federal court sitting in Iowa. 29 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 8.96 Contracts ââ limitation of 30 liability ââ prohibited terms. 31 Notwithstanding section 8A.311, subsection 22, and rules 32 adopted pursuant to that subsection, the director may include 33 a contractual limitation of vendor liability in information 34 technology goods and services contracts. A contractual 35 -6- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 6/ 15 S.F. 630 limitation of vendor liability must take into consideration the 1 public interest and the mitigation of risks associated with the 2 use of information technology goods or services. Any portion 3 of a contractual limitation of vendor liability that includes 4 a repudiation of all liability for cybersecurity incidents or 5 a limitation on the vendorâs liability for intentional torts, 6 criminal acts, fraudulent conduct, intentional or willful 7 misconduct, gross negligence, death, bodily injury, damage to 8 real or personal property, intellectual property violations, 9 liquidated damages, compliance with applicable laws, violations 10 of confidential information obligations, or contractual 11 obligations of the vendor pertaining to indemnification shall 12 be void as a matter of law as contrary to public policy. A 13 contractual limit of vendor liability that does not apply 14 equally to the contracted parties or that limits a vendorâs 15 liability to less than the contract value inclusive of all 16 possible extensions is void as a matter of law as contrary to 17 public policy. 18 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 8.97 Confidentiality of communications 19 with chief information security officer. 20 In the interest of facilitating communication between 21 the chief information security officer and other entities 22 concerning security incidents and security breaches, all such 23 communications and any documents generated based in whole or in 24 part on such communications are confidential. Notwithstanding 25 chapter 22 or any other provision of law to the contrary, the 26 department shall not release such communications pursuant to 27 state open records laws, and such communications shall not be 28 received into evidence, subject to discovery, or otherwise 29 used in a trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before any 30 court, regulatory body, or other authority of the state or a 31 political subdivision of the state, unless the communications 32 are subject to a protective order that prohibits further 33 disclosure of such communications and requires any court 34 filings of such communications to be made under seal. It is 35 -7- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 7/ 15 S.F. 630 the intent of the general assembly that these prohibitions and 1 restrictions also apply to federal courts, regulatory bodies, 2 and other authorities and for purposes of federal open records 3 laws, to the extent allowed by federal law and court rules. 4 The chief information security officer shall not release such 5 communications other than for any of the following purposes: 6 1. Identifying a cybersecurity threat, including the source 7 of the cybersecurity threat, or a security vulnerability, and 8 then only to government officials for purposes of addressing 9 the threat. 10 2. Responding to, or otherwise preventing or mitigating, 11 a specific threat of death, serious bodily harm, or serious 12 economic harm. 13 3. Responding to, investigating, prosecuting, or otherwise 14 preventing or mitigating a serious threat to a minor, including 15 sexual exploitation and threats to physical safety. 16 4. Preventing, investigating, disrupting, or prosecuting an 17 offense under state or federal law. 18 5. Providing a confidential cybersecurity briefing to the 19 governor or a member of the general assembly. 20 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 8.98 Criminal justice information. 21 1. The department is authorized to maintain an integrated 22 information system that enables automated data sharing among 23 the executive branch, judicial branch, and local agencies. 24 2. The department is designated as the Iowa statistical 25 analysis center for the purpose of coordinating with data 26 resource agencies to provide data and analytical information 27 to federal, state, and local governments. Notwithstanding any 28 other provision of state law to the contrary, unless prohibited 29 by federal law or regulation, the department shall be granted 30 access, for purposes of research and evaluation, to all of 31 the data listed in this subsection, except that intelligence 32 data and peace officer investigative reports maintained 33 by the department of public safety shall not be considered 34 data for the purposes of this section. The department of 35 -8- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 8/ 15 S.F. 630 management and any record, data, or information obtained by the 1 department under this subsection is subject to the federal and 2 state confidentiality laws and rules, including as described 3 in chapter 22, applicable to the original record, data, or 4 information, and to the original custodian of the record, 5 data, or information. Authorized access under this subsection 6 includes but is not limited to all of the following: 7 a. Juvenile court records and all other information 8 maintained under sections 232.147 through 232.151. 9 b. Child abuse information under sections 235A.15 through 10 235A.19. 11 c. Dependent adult abuse records maintained under chapter 12 235B. 13 d. Criminal history data maintained under chapter 692. 14 e. Sex offender registry information maintained under 15 chapter 692A. 16 f. Presentence investigation reports maintained under 17 section 901.4. 18 g. Corrections records maintained under sections 904.601 and 19 904.602. 20 h. Community-based correctional program records maintained 21 under chapter 904. 22 i. Parole records maintained under chapter 906. 23 j. Deferred judgment, deferred or suspended sentence, and 24 probation records maintained under chapter 907. 25 k. Violation of parole or probation records maintained under 26 chapter 908. 27 l. Fine and victim restitution records maintained under 28 chapters 909 and 910. 29 m. Child welfare records maintained under chapter 235. 30 3. The department is authorized to provide data analysis and 31 reporting on issues that may affect the stateâs correctional 32 population and various subgroups of the population. This 33 reporting may include the review of filed, public legislative 34 bills, joint resolutions, and amendments, and compiling 35 -9- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 9/ 15 S.F. 630 criminal justice data for completion of correctional impact 1 statements under section 2.56, racial impact statements, and an 2 annual prison population forecast. 3 4. The department is authorized to maintain a multiagency 4 information system to track the progress of juveniles and 5 adults who have been charged with a criminal offense in 6 the court system through various state and local agencies 7 and programs. This system must utilize existing databases, 8 including the Iowa court information system, the Iowa 9 corrections offender network, the child welfare information 10 system of the department of health and human services, 11 the federally mandated national adoption and foster care 12 information system, and other state and local databases 13 pertaining to juveniles and to adults who have been charged 14 with a criminal offense in the court system, to the extent 15 practicable. 16 5. The multiagency information system is authorized to 17 count and track decision points for juveniles in the juvenile 18 justice system and minors in the child welfare system, evaluate 19 the experiences of the juveniles and minors, and evaluate 20 the success of the services provided. The system is also 21 authorized to count and track decision points for adults who 22 have been charged with a criminal offense in the court system, 23 including but not limited to dismissed charges, convictions, 24 deferred judgments, and sentence information. 25 6. If the department has insufficient moneys or resources 26 to implement this section, the department is authorized to 27 determine which portion of this section may be implemented, if 28 any, and the remainder of this section shall not apply. 29 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 8.99 Confidentiality of data. 30 1. For purposes of chapter 22, the department shall not be 31 deemed to be the lawful custodian of records the department 32 maintains for another department or establishment under this 33 subchapter, to the extent the records in question are held 34 by the department as an automated data processing unit of 35 -10- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 10/ 15 S.F. 630 government or held by the department solely for storage for 1 another department or establishment. Such records include but 2 are not limited to all of the following: 3 a. Electronic messaging system data. 4 b. Mainframe data. 5 c. Storage solutions or other electronic information, such 6 as on-premises server data storage and cloud data storage. 7 2. If the department receives a request pursuant to chapter 8 22 for records over which the department has determined it is 9 not the lawful custodian, the department shall deny the request 10 and inform the requester to seek the information from the 11 lawful custodian as provided in chapter 22. The departmentâs 12 determination that it is not the lawful custodian of records is 13 presumed valid. The presumption may be rebutted by clear and 14 convincing evidence to the contrary. 15 3. The department shall provide assistance to the lawful 16 custodian of records held by the department so that the lawful 17 custodian can comply with the production obligations of chapter 18 22. 19 4. If the department receives a subpoena in an 20 administrative, civil, or criminal case for records for which 21 the department is not the lawful custodian, the department 22 shall notify the lawful custodian and the attorney generalâs 23 office and cooperate in any efforts to resist the subpoena. 24 Sec. 9. Section 216A.131A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 216A.131A Criminal and juvenile justice planning. 27 The department shall fulfill the responsibilities of 28 this subchapter , including the duties specified in sections 29 216A.133, 216A.135 , 216A.136 , 216A.137 , 216A.138 , and 216A.140 . 30 Sec. 10. Section 216A.133, subsection 1, paragraphs d, e, f, 31 l, and t, Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 32 Sec. 11. Section 216A.133, subsection 1, paragraph q, 33 subparagraphs (1) and (6), Code 2025, are amended by striking 34 the subparagraphs. 35 -11- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 11/ 15 S.F. 630 Sec. 12. Section 216A.133, subsection 1, paragraph s, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 s. Provide expertise and advice to the legislative 3 services agency, the department of management, the department 4 of corrections, the judicial branch, and others charged 5 with formulating fiscal, correctional, or minority impact 6 statements. 7 Sec. 13. Section 216A.135, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code 8 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 9 Sec. 14. Section 232.147, subsection 2, paragraph i, Code 10 2025, is amended to read as follows: 11 i. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated 12 in section 216A.136 8.98 . 13 Sec. 15. Section 232.147, subsection 3, paragraph n, Code 14 2025, is amended to read as follows: 15 n. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated 16 in section 216A.136 8.98 . 17 Sec. 16. Section 232.147, subsection 4, paragraph i, Code 18 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 i. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated 20 in section 216A.136 8.98 . 21 Sec. 17. Section 232.149, subsection 5, paragraph f, Code 22 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 f. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated 24 in section 216A.136 8.98 . 25 Sec. 18. Section 232.149A, subsection 3, paragraph m, Code 26 2025, is amended to read as follows: 27 m. The statistical analysis center for the purposes stated 28 in section 216A.136 8.98 . 29 Sec. 19. Section 513C.10, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 a. All persons that provide health benefit plans in this 32 state including insurers providing accident and sickness 33 insurance under chapter 509 , 514 , or 514A , whether on an 34 individual or group basis; fraternal benefit societies 35 -12- LSB 1362SZ (2) 91 sc/ns 12/ 15 S.F. 630 providing hospital, medical, or nursing benefits under chapter 1 512B ; and health maintenance organizations, other entities 2 providing health insurance or health benefits subject to state 3 insurance regulation, and all other insurers as designated 4 by the board of directors of the Iowa comprehensive health 5 insurance association with the approval of the commissioner 6 shall be members of the association. However, the state, 7 including an institution under the control of the state board 8 of regents, shall not be a member of the association. 9 Sec. 20. REPEAL. Sections 216A.136, 216A.137, and 10 216A.138, Code 2025, are repealed. 11 Sec. 21. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 12 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment: 13 The section of this Act amending section 513C.10, subsection 14 1, paragraph âaâ. 15 Sec. 22. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect July 1, 16 2026: 17 The portions of the section of this Act amending section 18 8.57C, subsections 2 and 4. 19 Sec. 23. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to contracts 20 entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2025: 21 1. The section of this Act enacting section 8.94. 22 2. The section of this Act enacting section 8.95. 23 3. The section of this Act enacting section 8.96. 24 Sec. 24. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following applies 25 retroactively to January 1, 2020: 26 The section of this Act amending section 513C.10, subsection 27 1, paragraph âaâ. 28